Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 42
SHARES AND STOCK

Section

11-42-101. Investment and savings shares.

Every association may issue and sell an unlimited number of shares of the following types, as described in this section:

"Investment shares" are shares on which the full payment has been made and on which dividends shall be paid in cash.

"Savings shares" are shares on which an initial payment has been made, and upon which further payments are to be made at such times and in such amounts as are optional with the member, and on which dividends shall be credited unless otherwise agreed that all or part shall be paid in cash.

"Short-term savings shares" are shares which are to be withdrawn in less than twenty-four months from the date on which such share account is opened, or a share account established for the purpose of accumulating funds to pay taxes or insurance premiums, or both, in connection with a loan on the security of a lien on real estate. No association shall be required to distribute earnings on short-term savings shares.

Source:

L. 33:

pp. 312-317, §§ 1-6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 19.

L. 39:

p. 248, § 19.

L. 43:

p. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-1.

L. 55:

p. 761, § 5.

L. 59:

p. 659, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-1.

11-42-102. Preliminary requirements.

Shares may be purchased and held absolutely by or in trust for any person, partnership, association, corporation, or trustee. Certificates shall be issued to each purchaser of shares at the time of making full or initial payment thereon, and at the same time share account books shall be issued to purchasers of savings shares.

Source:

L. 33:

pp. 312-317, §§ 1-6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 19.

L. 39:

p. 248, § 19.

L. 43:

p. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-2.

L. 55:

p. 761, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-2.

11-42-103. Contents of certificate - accounts.

A share account shall be kept on the books of the association with each certificate holder showing the aggregate of all payments made, plus dividends paid in cash or credited. The aggregate of all payments made, plus dividends credited, less withdrawals, shall be termed the "certificate value" or "withdrawal value" of the account.

Source:

L. 33:

pp. 312-317, §§ 1-6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 19.

L. 39:

p. 248, § 19.

L. 43:

p. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-3.

L. 55:

p. 762, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-3.

11-42-104. Participating and limited dividend shares.

Shares may be issued to participate fully or to a limited extent in the net earnings of the association if the articles of incorporation so provide, and such participation shall be specified in the body of the certificate. All shares participating fully in net earnings shall be entitled to an equal rate of dividend, if earned, as fixed by the board of directors. Shares participating to a limited extent shall be entitled to such rate of dividend, if earned, as fixed by the board of directors for the semiannual periods ending June thirtieth and December thirty-first of each year; but, if the rate is decreased, the shareholders thus affected shall be given written notice of the new rate, within thirty days after date of declaration, by mailing such notice to their last known addresses.

Source:

L. 33:

pp. 312-317, §§ 1-6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 19.

L. 39:

p. 248, § 19.

L. 43:

p. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-4.

L. 55:

p. 762, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-4.

11-42-105. Responsibility for losses - extent.

The members of an association shall not be responsible for any losses which its invested capital is not sufficient to satisfy, except to the extent provided in sections 11-42-108 to 11-42-110, and the shares shall not be subject to assessment, nor shall certificate holders be liable for any unpaid installment on their shares. Except as provided in article 47 of this title, no preference between certificate holders shall be created with respect to the distribution of assets upon voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of an association. Shareholders in mutual associations shall participate in the distribution of all assets, and in permanent stock associations they shall participate first, but only to the extent of their share investments.

Source:

L. 33:

pp. 312-317, §§ 1-6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 19.

L. 39:

p. 248, § 19.

L. 43:

p. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-5.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 406, § 2, effective January 1, 1976.

11-42-106. Transfer of shares.

Share certificates are transferable on the books of the association by the holder thereof, in person or by a duly authorized attorney, upon surrender of the certificate properly endorsed. The association may treat the holder of record thereof as the owner for all purposes without being affected by any notice to the contrary until the certificate is transferred on the books of the association. A transfer charge of not to exceed fifty cents may be charged for each certificate transferred on its books.

Source:

L. 33:

pp. 312-317, §§ 1-6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 19.

L. 39:

p. 248, § 19.

L. 43:

p. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-6.

L. 55:

p. 762, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-6.

11-42-107. Permanent stock.

Permanent stock shall be of one class only, shall have the full voting rights, and shall have a par value of not less than one dollar per share; and the proceeds thereof, to the extent of such par value, shall be set apart, shall be nonwithdrawable, and shall be a reserve to absorb losses after all surplus, undivided profits, and other reserves available for losses have been depleted.

Any paid-in surplus may be made available for payment of organization and initial operating expenses, or may be credited to surplus, or to the contingent reserve, or to the federal insurance reserve, or may be transferred to permanent stock as a stock dividend and prorated to the holders of permanent stock. An association shall not issue permanent stock for a consideration other than cash or for a price less than the par value thereof, but, with the approval of the commissioner, stock may be issued for a consideration other than cash in connection with mergers, consolidations, or transfers, and, when fully paid, the stock shall be kept unimpaired to the extent of its par value.

An association may declare and distribute stock dividends from net earnings, or surplus, or undivided profits. With the prior consent of the commissioner, the stock of an association may be reduced by resolution of the board of directors approved by vote or written consent of the holders of a majority of the outstanding stock of such association to such amount as the commissioner shall approve, and any such reduction shall be credited to the contingent reserve account and shall not be available for dividends to stockholders or shareholders; but any reduction in the amount of permanent stock is subject to the provisions of this section and section 11-41-105 fixing minimum permanent stock requirements.

Except as may be required by the commissioner pursuant to section 11-41-105, no association shall be required to maintain permanent stock in excess of five hundred thousand dollars; however, the total amount of permanent stock subscribed to and paid for shall not at any time, until the maximum of five hundred thousand dollars has been reached, be less than at least the following percentages of the aggregate certificate value of the outstanding invested capital (excluding permanent stock) standing on the records of the association as of January 1 of the current year: Three percent on five million dollars; two percent on five million one dollars through seven million five hundred thousand dollars; one percent on all over seven million five hundred thousand dollars.

As used in this subsection (5), the term "impaired" means a condition in which an association is unable to meet current obligations as they mature.

Cash dividends may be declared and paid on permanent stock unless an association is in an impaired condition or the payment thereof would cause the association's assets to be impaired. Nothing in this subsection (5) shall affect subsection (1) of this section, section 11-42-111 (1) or (7), or other provisions of articles 40 to 47 of this title, restricting the payment of dividends on permanent stock. Subject to the provisions of articles 40 to 47 of this title, permanent stock shall be entitled to such rate of dividends, if earned, as fixed by the board of directors.

Any association which intends to declare a cash dividend on permanent stock shall provide a minimum of thirty days' written notice of its intention to the commissioner.

Directors' and stockholders' meetings shall be called, advertised, and held in accordance with section 11-41-123, but the holders of permanent stock shall have exclusive voting rights.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 317, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 25.

L. 43:

p. 204, § 5.

L. 51:

p. 212, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-7.

L. 55:

p. 762, § 10.

L. 59:

p. 660, § 3.

L. 61:

p. 649, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-7.

L. 83:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 490, § 3, effective April 26.

L. 85:

(5)(c) added, p. 399, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 1491, § 17, effective June 1.

11-42-108. Assessment to restore impaired permanent stock.

Stockholders, after their stock has been fully paid, are not liable to creditors or for assessments upon their stock issued on or after July 1, 1981, except as provided by this section. If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report made to him, finds that the permanent stock of any association is impaired, he shall notify the association that such impairment exists. In the event the amount of the impairment, as determined by the commissioner, is questioned by the association, then, upon application filed within ten days, the value of the assets in question shall be determined by appraisals made by independent appraisers acceptable to the commissioner and the association.

If the bylaws of an association expressly give the directors the authority to levy an assessment on permanent stock, then, subject to any limitations contained in the bylaws, the directors may levy and collect assessments upon permanent stock. The directors of an association which has received such notice may levy a pro rata assessment upon the permanent stock thereof to make good such impairment and shall cause notice of the finding of the commissioner and such levy to be given in writing to each stockholder of such association and the amount of assessment which the stockholder must pay for the purpose of making good such impairment; but, in lieu of making such assessment, the impairment may be made good, without the consent of the commissioner, by the reduction of the permanent stock in the manner provided in section 11-42-107.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 317, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 25.

L. 43:

p. 204, § 5.

L. 51:

p. 212, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-8.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 623, § 3, effective May 18.

11-42-109. Sale of delinquent stock.

If any stockholder refuses or neglects to pay the assessment specified in such notice within sixty days from the date of mailing, the directors of such association shall have the right to sell to the highest bidder at public auction any part or all of the stock necessary to pay the assessment of such stockholder, after giving a previous notice of such sale for ten days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the principal office of such association in this state is located, and a copy of such notice of sale shall also be served on such stockholder by mailing a copy of the notice to his last known address ten days before the day fixed for such sale, or such stock may be sold at a private sale and without public notice; but, before making such private sale thereof, an offer in writing shall first be obtained and a copy thereof served upon the owner of record of the stock to be sold by mailing a copy of such offer to his last known address, and, if, after service of such offer, such owner still refuses or neglects to pay such assessment within thirty days from the time of the service of such offer, the directors may accept the offer and sell such stock to the person making such offer or to any other person making a larger offer than the amount named in the offer submitted to the stockholder, but such stock in no event shall be sold for less than the amount of such assessment so called for and the expense of the sale.

Out of the proceeds of the stock sold, the directors shall pay the amount of assessment levied thereon and the necessary cost of sale, and the balance, if any, shall be paid to the person whose stock has been sold. A sale of stock as provided in this section shall effect an absolute cancellation of the outstanding certificate evidencing the stock sold and shall make the same null and void, and a new certificate shall be issued by the association to the purchaser thereof.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 317, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 25.

L. 43:

p. 204, § 5.

L. 51:

p. 212, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-9.

11-42-110. Forfeiture of delinquent stock.

If no bid or offer is received equal to or more than the amount of such assessment and the expense of sale, such stock shall be declared forfeited to the association and accepted in full satisfaction of such assessment, and such stock shall not be reissued except in accordance with a permit thereafter obtained from the commissioner pursuant to section 11-42-112.

The proceeds from any assessment, less the cost of any sales and any forfeiture of delinquent stock, shall be credited to the contingent reserve account.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 317, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 25.

L. 43:

p. 204, § 5.

L. 51:

p. 212, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-10.

11-42-111. Reserves and distribution of earnings.

Every association shall maintain general reserves for the sole purpose of meeting losses. Such reserves shall include the following: Permanent stock, federal insurance reserve, contingent reserve, state tax reserve, and any special purpose reserve established for the sole purpose of absorbing losses by action of the association's board of directors or at the request of the commissioner.

Repealed.

Every association shall set up and maintain a reserve, referred to in articles 40 to 46 of this title as the "contingent reserve", by transfers from net earnings on the closing date fixed for such associations as provided in articles 40 to 46 of this title.

Every association may set up and maintain a reserve, referred to in articles 40 to 46 of this title as the "state tax reserve" in accordance with article 2 of title 29 and articles 20 to 28 of title 39, C.R.S., by annual transfers from the contingent reserve. The state tax reserve shall be considered as a part of the contingent reserve.

Any losses may be charged against general reserves; except that losses may not be charged against permanent stock until all other reserves available for losses have been depleted. Moreover, losses may not be charged to the contingent reserve until any special reserve set up to absorb such losses has been exhausted. Any determined excess in any other reserve may be transferred to the contingent reserve. Allowance for depreciation of assets shall not be charged against general reserves but shall be charged to undivided profits, surplus, or net earnings.

As of each closing date fixed for such association as provided in articles 40 to 47 of this title, each association shall transfer to general reserves an amount which is not less than five percent of its net earnings until general reserves are equal to ten percent of invested capital (excluding permanent stock). If, after having reached ten percent, general reserves should fall below ten percent of invested capital (excluding permanent stock), credits of five percent of net income shall be resumed until general reserves shall again equal ten percent of invested capital (excluding permanent stock). General reserves may be increased over the required ten percent in any amount as may be determined by the board of directors to be for the best interest of the association. Notwithstanding the number of closing dates fixed for an association, not more than two such transfers shall be required annually, but more frequent transfers may be made by an association with the approval of the commissioner.

As of each closing date fixed for such association as provided in articles 40 to 47 of this title, the board of directors of each association shall declare a dividend on all share accounts, if any, that it then has and may also, from net earnings, declare a dividend on permanent stock in such association, but no association shall be required to distribute earnings on Christmas savings shares or deposits or other short-term savings shares or deposits or on share or deposit balances of less than an amount specified by the board of directors, if said amount is disclosed to shareholders or depositors in advance, including reasonable notice of changes. In lieu of or in addition to such net earnings, all or any part of undivided profits or surplus of an association may be likewise distributed, but no funds received as part of the sale price of permanent stock or paid in as an assessment shall be distributed as a cash dividend on permanent stock.

Dividends shall be declared on and pro rata to the certificate value of each share at the beginning of the dividend period, plus payments made thereon during the dividend period (less amounts withdrawn and, for purposes of participation in earnings, deducted from the latest previous payments), computed at the declared rate for the time invested, determined as provided in subsection (9) of this section.

The date of investment shall be the date of actual receipt of such payments by the association unless the board of directors fixes a date, not later than the tenth of the month, for determining the date of investment of payments on shares or designated classes thereof. Payments affected by such determination date, received by the association on or before such determination date, shall receive earnings as if invested on the first of such month.

Payments affected by such determination date, received subsequent to such determination date, shall receive earnings as if invested on the first of the next succeeding month.

In all mutual associations issuing limited dividend shares, no dividends shall be paid or credited on fully participating free shares until all current maximum dividends on limited dividend shares have been paid or credited and until at least an equal dividend has been credited to fully participating loan shares.

In permanent stock associations, no dividends shall be declared on the permanent stock until all current maximum dividends on limited dividend shares have been paid or credited.

With approval of the commissioner, associations may pay a variable rate of dividends on shares.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Colorado "Savings and Loan Association Law", article 40 of this title, any association may distribute earnings on its shares on such other dates, on such other bases, and in accordance with such other terms and conditions as may from time to time be authorized by regulations made by the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor or the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor for federal savings and loan associations when such regulations are approved by the commissioner.

A depreciation reserve, an unearned profits account, an interest due and uncollected account, and a bonus reserve shall be set up and maintained when required.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 364, § 26.

CSA:

C. 25, § 94.

L. 39:

p. 254, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-11.

L. 59:

p. 661, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-11.

L. 72:

p. 617, § 152.

L. 73:

p. 1237, § 4.

L. 77:

(7) amended, p. 572, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 83:

(6) and (7) amended, p. 491, § 4, effective April 26.

L. 2004:

(2) repealed and (14) amended, pp. 151, 138, §§ 58, 19, effective July 1.

11-42-112. Requirements for sale of permanent stock.

No association shall sell, offer for sale, negotiate for the sale of or take subscriptions for, or issue any of its permanent stock until it has first applied for and secured from the commissioner a permit authorizing it so to do. Such application shall be in writing, verified, and filed with the commissioner. In such application, the association shall set forth the names and addresses of its officers, the location of its office, an itemized account of its financial condition, the amount and character of its stock and shares, a copy of any prospectus or advertisement or other description of its stock to be distributed or published, a copy of all minutes of any proceedings of its directors, shareholders, or stockholders relating to or affecting the issue of such stock, and such additional information concerning the association, its condition, and its affairs as the commissioner may require. Upon the filing of such application, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to examine it and the other papers and documents filed therewith.

If he finds that the proposed issue is such as will not mislead the public as to the nature of the investment or will not work a fraud upon the purchaser thereof, the commissioner shall issue to the association a permit authorizing it to issue and dispose of its stock in such amounts as the commissioner may in such permit provide; otherwise he shall deny the application and notify the association in writing of his decision.

Every permit shall recite in bold type that the issuance thereof is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the stock permitted to be issued. The commissioner may impose conditions requiring the impoundment of the proceeds from the sale of such stock and limiting the expense in connection with the sale thereof and such other conditions as he may deem reasonable and necessary or advisable to insure the disposition of the proceeds from the sale of such stock in the manner and for the purposes provided in such permit. The commissioner from time to time may amend, alter, or revoke any permit issued by him or temporarily suspend the rights of such association under such permit. The commissioner has the power to establish such rules and regulations as may be reasonable or necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 318, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-12.

11-42-113. Redemption of shares or stock.

Every savings and loan association may redeem its shares or stock and repay the funds acquired thereby with such earnings as the same may be entitled to according to the terms of the issue thereof if the same are no longer required for the purposes of the association upon giving thirty days' written notice in the manner provided in the bylaws of the association, but the association cannot redeem permanent stock. The method of redemption shall be prescribed in the bylaws of the association.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 355, § 9.

CSA:

C. 25, § 77.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-13.

11-42-114. Bonus plan.

Any association may adopt a plan for the payment of a cash bonus to members agreeing to make share investments in order to provide funds for the financing of homes. Such plan, before being adopted, shall be approved by a majority of the members of the board of directors at any regular or special meeting thereof and shall become effective upon the filing with and approval of the commissioner. The board of directors at any regular or special meeting may abolish the bonus plan as to shares purchased after the date of such action.

After adoption and approval of such bonus plan, the board of directors shall transfer out of net earnings to an account designated "bonus reserve" an amount which, together with existing credits to the bonus reserve, is sufficient to pay the bonus on all accounts then entitled to participation in the bonus reserve in accordance with the provisions of this section. The board of directors may transfer any excess in the bonus reserve to the undivided profits account.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 357, § 13.

CSA:

C. 25, § 81.

L. 39:

p. 254, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-14.

L. 59:

p. 664, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-14.

11-42-115. Power to issue shares to minors or in trust.

Every association has the power to issue stock or shares to a minor of any age and either sex and receive payments thereon from, by, or for the minor. He shall be entitled to withdraw, transfer, or pledge any such shares owned by him and to receive from such association any dividends or other moneys at any time becoming due thereon in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an adult, and his receipt or acquittance therefor shall constitute a valid release and discharge to the association for the payment of such moneys. The dealing of an association with a minor shall have the same effect upon the association's liability as if the minor were of full legal capacity, until his guardian or conservator files with the association a certified copy of the order of a Colorado court having jurisdiction appointing the guardian or conservator and directing otherwise.

Subject to such regulations as the board of directors of the association may prescribe, an association may contract with the proper authorities of any public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or any public or charitable institution caring for minors for the participation by the association in any school or institutional thrift or savings plan.

Every association has power to issue stock or shares to any person on a revocable trust for another person, who is either named in writing as beneficiary thereof or who is unnamed. At any time during the lifetime of the trustee, the stock or shares, together with dividends, if any, shall be withdrawn only by the trustee. On the death of the trustee, the stock or shares, together with dividends, if any, shall be paid to the person for whom the stock or shares were issued as designated beneficiary, even though the beneficiary is not of full legal capacity, and, if there is no designated beneficiary living at that time, then to the personal representative of the trustee.

The foregoing authorization shall not be construed as providing an exclusive method for a trustee to invest in stock or shares of an association. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting or repealing either section 28-5-214 or 28-5-301, C.R.S., with respect to investment of funds by guardians and conservators of minor and incompetent beneficiaries of the veterans administration, heretofore or hereafter appointed, or part 3 of article 1 of title 15, C.R.S., with respect to investments by fiduciaries.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 351, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-15.

L. 57:

p. 652, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-15.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 647, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1359, § 7, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For competence of persons 18 years of age or older generally, see § 13-22-101.

11-42-116. Joint accounts.

Except as to accounts, which are defined in and which are paid as provided in article 15 of title 15, C.R.S., where shares or stock of an association is issued in the name of two or more persons or the survivors of them, such shares or stock and all dues paid on account thereof by either or any of such persons shall become the property of such persons as joint tenants, and the same, together with dividends, shall be held for the exclusive use of such persons and may be paid to either or any of them during their lifetimes or to the survivors of them after the death of one or more of them, and such payment and the receipt and acquittance of the persons to whom such payment is made shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to such association for all payments made on account of such shares or stock.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 351, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-16.

L. 73:

p. 1649, § 14.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 587, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 920, § 4, effective July 1.

11-42-117. Notice of intention to withdraw.

Each association may, at its option, prescribe a period or periods of notice of intention to withdraw. The period of any such notice of intention to withdraw shall not exceed sixty days. All notices of intention to withdraw shall be set forth and be a part of the bylaws of the association. All periods of notice of intention to withdraw shall be disclosed to members at the time of opening an account and shall appear on the shares as described in section 11-42-101. Each association may prescribe by its bylaws the terms and conditions of withdrawal which are not contrary to the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title. The shares shall state that the right of withdrawal is subject to the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title. This section shall not apply to tax and loan accounts, note accounts, or similar accounts when, subject to the regulations of the United States treasury, the association is serving as a depository for federal taxes or as a treasury tax and loan depository.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 319, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-17.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 432, § 8, effective June 19.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 501, § 1, effective May 23.

11-42-118. Form of notice.

Any notice of intention to withdraw shall be invalid unless it is given in writing and is signed by a member entitled to make a withdrawal.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 320, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-18.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 501, § 2, effective May 23.

11-42-119. Filing of notice.

All notices of intention to withdraw shall be filed when received by each association in the order in which they are received, and each shall be kept on file with the exact time of the receipt thereof noted thereon, or recorded, until it is paid or canceled at the written request of the member.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 320, § 3.

CSA:

C. 25, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-19.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 501, § 3, effective May 23.

11-42-120. Shares or account not withdrawable.

No member whose shares are pledged or whose account is pledged as security for a real estate loan from the association issuing such shares or accepting such account shall be permitted to make a withdrawal or be entitled to give any valid notice of intention to withdraw in respect of such shares or account until the indebtedness for which such shares are pledged or for which such account is pledged as security has been fully paid; except that withdrawals may be made without notice if the full amount of such withdrawals is used to pay such indebtedness or any part thereof.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 320, § 4.

CSA:

C. 25, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-20.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 502, § 4, effective May 23.

11-42-121. Payment of withdrawals.

In case the funds of an association applicable to withdrawals are not sufficient to pay off all members desiring to withdraw, such members may be paid off in either one of two methods, dependent upon which method the board of directors of the association may desire to follow, in full in the order in which withdrawal notices are filed or on a pro rata basis, as follows:

In the event an association elects to pay withdrawals in full in the order in which withdrawal notices are filed, all notices of withdrawal shall be filed in writing in order of time in which filed, and shall be kept in numerical order and so numbered, and shall be paid in the order filed as funds are available for that purpose.

As to associations which elect to pay withdrawals on a pro rata basis, all shares or accounts on which notices of withdrawal have been filed during any period of notice shall receive their pro rata share of the funds available for withdrawal at the end of such notice period, based upon the withdrawal value of the shares or account at the time distribution is made.

Repealed.

Notice of withdrawal shall not make such withdrawing member a creditor of the association.

As to all shares on which a withdrawal notice is on file, the holder thereof shall be entitled to the same rate of dividends paid like shares not on withdrawal.

In all cases, withdrawals shall be governed by the bylaws of the association insofar as such bylaws are not in conflict with the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 321, § 5.

CSA:

C. 25, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-20.

L. 83:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) amended and (1)(c) repealed, pp. 502, 503, §§ 5, 7, effective May 23.

11-42-122. Limitation on withdrawals.

If an association has on file more withdrawal requests than can be met in full from current funds, the association shall apply to such withdrawals one-half of the monthly receipts, after first deducting the amount necessary to pay the actual and reasonable expenses incurred in the operation of the association and the protection of its assets and reserves set up by it for cash dividends on its shares; except that, should such one-half fail to retire at least five percent of the aggregate withdrawal requests, such portion of the other one-half shall be applied as shall be necessary to retire five percent of the total amount on withdrawal.

"Receipts", as used in this section, means all funds coming into the hands of the association except borrowed money.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 322, § 6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-22.

Editor's note:

The provisions within this section were renumbered on revision in 1998 to conform to statutory numbering format.

11-42-123. Matured shares.

If, at the time shares in a savings and loan association have matured, the association has withdrawal notices on file to such an extent that the funds of the association, applicable to withdrawals, are not sufficient to pay off all shareholders desiring to withdraw, as well as shares which have matured and are unpaid, and the holder of the matured shares desires to withdraw, he shall file a notice of intention to withdraw and thereafter be subject to all the rights and liabilities of articles 40 to 46 of this title governing withdrawing shareholders; except that he shall be entitled to the full amount of any dividends declared on like shares during the time he has a withdrawal notice on file on same.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 323, § 7.

CSA:

C. 25, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-23.

11-42-124. Applicable to previously issued certificates.

All stock or shares or certificates or instruments of whatsoever kind issued by savings and loan associations prior to June 8, 1933, evidencing savings in said associations by the holders thereof, except permanent or nonwithdrawable stock, shall be subject to all the rights and all the liabilities of articles 40 to 46 of this title, and such holders shall be treated as shareholders.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 323, § 8.

CSA:

C. 25, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 122-3-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-3-24.